Utah statutes.
57-3-107.   Unenforceable covenants -- Definition -- Inclusion in recorded document.

(1) As used in this chapter, "unenforceable covenant" means a restriction on alienation of real property, whether recited in a document to be recorded under this chapter, or recited in a document of record under this chapter, which is based on race, gender, national origin, marital status, or a similar classification determined to be unenforceable under state or federal law.

(2)  A document which recites an unenforceable covenant may be recorded as provided in this chapter.

(3)  Any unenforceable covenant recited in a document to be recorded under this chapter or recited in a document of record is considered void, but does not invalidate the remainder of the document.

